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DTC B 1149/37 Front Airbag Sensor LH Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The front airbag sensor LH circuit consists of the diagnosis circuit and frontal deceleration sensor, etc.
If receives signals from the frontal deceleration sensor, judges whether or not the SRS must be activated,
and detects diagnosis system malfunction.
DTC B1149/37 is recorded when malfunction is detected in the front airbag sensor LH circuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

B1149/37 SFrontairbagsensorLHmalfunction

SFrontairbagsensorLH
SAirbagsensorassembly
SDashwire
SEngine roomNo.2wire
SEngine roommainwire

HINT:
DTC B1149/37 is indicated only for the vehicle equipped with the side airbag and without the side airbag
(dual stage airbag).
WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Is DTC B11 49/37 output?

CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI−432).
(c) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10

seconds.
(d) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(e) Check the DTC (See page DI−432).
OK:

DTC B11 49/37 is output.
HINT:
Codes other than code B1149/37 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NO The malfunctioning part can now be considered
normal. To make sure of this, use the simulation
method to check.

YES

2 Is connector of front airbag sensor LH properly connected?

NO Connect connector.

YES

3 Prepare for inspection (See step 1 on page DI−764).
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4 Check wire harness.

PREPARATION:
Usingaservicewire, connect+SLand −SLon the frontairbag
sensorLHsidebetween theairbagsensorassemblyand the
frontairbagsensorLH.
CHECK:
Measure the resistancebetween+SLand − SLon theairbag
sensorassemblysidebetween the frontairbagsensorLHand
the airbag sensor assembly.
OK:

Resistance:Below 1 �

NG Go to step 8.

OK

5 Check wire harness (to ground).

CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the body ground and each of
+SLand −SLon theairbagsensorassemblysidebetween the
frontairbagsensorLHand theairbagsensorassembly.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M� orHigher

NGGotostep 10.

OK
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6 Check wire harness (to B+).

PREPARATION:
Connect thenegative ( −) terminal cable to thebattery,andwait
at least for2seconds.
CHECK:
(a)Turn the ignitionswitch toON.
(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and each

of+SLand −SLon theairbagsensorassemblysidebe-
tween the front airbag sensor LH and the airbag sensor
assembly.

OK:
Voltage:Below 1 V

NGGotostep 12.

OK
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7 Check airbag sensor assembly.

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnect the negative (−) terminal cable from the bat-

tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.
(d) Change the front airbag sensor RH position with LH posi-

tion.
(e) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,

and wait at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI−432).
(c) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10

seconds.
(d) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(e) Check the DTC (See page DI−432).
OK:

Neither DTC B1148/36 nor B1149/37 not output.
HINT:
Codes other than code B1149/37 or B1148/36 may be output
at this time, but they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace airbag sensor assembly
(DTC B1149/37 is output).

NG Replace front airbag sensor LH
(DTC B1148/36 is output).

OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check.
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8 Check engine room main wire.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the engine room main wire connector on the

airbag sensor assembly side.
(b) Using a service wire, connect +SL and −SL of the engine

room main wire on the front airbag sensor LH side.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between +SL and −SL of the engine
room main wire connector on the airbag sensor assembly side.
OK:

Resistance: Below 1 �

NG Repair or replace engine room main wire.

OK

9 Check engine room No. 2 wire.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the engine room No. 2 wire connector from

the dash wire.
(b) Using a service wire, connect +SL and −SL of the engine

room No. 2 wire on the engine room main wire side.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between +SL and −SL of the engine
room No. 2 wire connector on the dash wire side.
OK:

Resistance: Below 1 �

NG Repair or replace engine room No. 2 wire.

OK

Repair or replace dash wire.
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10 Check engine room main wire (to ground).

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the engine room main wire connector on the airbag
sensor assembly side.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the body ground and each of
+SL and −SL of the engine room main wire connector on the air-
bag sensor assembly side.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M� or Higher

NG Repair or replace engine room main wire.

OK

11 Check engine room No. 2 wire (to ground).

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the engine room No. 2 wire connector from the dash
wire.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the body ground and each of
+SL and −SL of the engine room No. 2 wire connector on the
dash wire side.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M� or Higher

NG Repair or replace engine room No. 2 wire.

OK

Repair or replace dash wire.
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12 Check engine room main wire (to B+).

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnect the negative (−) terminal cable from the bat-

tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Disconnect the engine room main wire connector on the

airbag sensor assembly side.
(d) Connec the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery, and

wait at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON.
(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and each

of +SL and −SL of the engine room main wire connector
on the airbag sensor assembly side.

OK:
Voltage: Below 1 V

NG Repair or replace engine room main wire.

OK

13 Check engine room No. 2 wire (to B+).

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnect the negative (−) terminal cable from the bat-

tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Disconnect the engine room No. 2 wire connector from

the dash wire.
(d) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,

and wait at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON.
(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and each

of +SL and −SL of the engine room No. 2 wire connector
on the dash wire side.

OK:
Voltage: Below 1 V

NG Repair or replace engine room No. 2 wire.

OK

Repair or replace dash wire.


